Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 475C.517 is amended to read:
475C.517. (1) Subject to subsection  (2) of this section, information is exempt from public disclo-
sure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 if the information is:
(a) The address of a premises for which  a license has been issued or for which an applicant has
proposed licensure under ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.548;
(b) Related to the security plan or the operational plan for a premises for which a license  has
been issued or for which an applicant has proposed licensure under ORS 475C.005 to  475C.525 or
475C.548; [or]
(c) Related to any record that the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis  Commission determines contains
proprietary information of a licensee[ .]; or
(d) The residential address or personal phone number of an individual  who holds a permit
issued under ORS 475C.273.
(2) The exemption from public disclosure as provided by this section does not apply to a  request
for information if the request is made by a law enforcement agency.
Enrolled Senate Bill 870 (SB 870-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 870 (SB 870-INTRO) Page 2